Missouri, session 2026, SB950.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.011, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
143.011 and 146.200, to read as follows:
143.011. 1. A tax is hereby imposed for every taxable
year on the Missouri taxable income of every resident. The
tax shall be determined by applying the tax table or the
rate provided in section 143.021, which is based upon the
following rates:
If the Missouri taxable The tax is:
income is:
Not over $1,000.00 1 1/2% of the Missouri
taxable income
Over $1,000 but not $15 plus 2% of excess over
over $2,000 $1,000
Over $2,000 but not $35 plus 2 1/2% of excess
over $3,000 over $2,000
Over $3,000 but not $60 plus 3% of excess over
over $4,000 $3,000
Over $4,000 but not $90 plus 3 1/2% of excess
over $5,000 over $4,000
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 950 2
Over $5,000 but not $125 plus 4% of excess over
over $6,000 $5,000
Over $6,000 but not $165 plus 4 1/2% of excess
over $7,000 over $6,000
Over $7,000 but not $210 plus 5% of excess over
over $8,000 $7,000
Over $8,000 but not $260 plus 5 1/2% of excess
over $9,000 over $8,000
Over $9,000 $315 plus 6% of excess over
$9,000
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1
of this section to the contrary, beginning with the 2023
calendar year, the top rate of tax pursuant to subsection 1
of this section shall be four and ninety-five hundredths
percent.
(2) The modification of tax rates made pursuant to
this subsection shall apply only to tax years that begin on
or after January 1, 2023.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax table provided in subsection 1 of
this section to effectuate the provisions of this
subsection. The top remaining rate of tax shall apply to
all income in excess of seven thousand dollars, as adjusted
pursuant to subsection 5 of this section.
3. (1) In addition to the rate reduction under
subsection 2 of this section, beginning with the 2024
calendar year, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of
this section may be reduced by fifteen hundredths of a
percent. A reduction in the rate of tax shall take effect

SB 950 3
on January first of a calendar year and such reduced rates
shall continue in effect until the next reduction occurs.
(2) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only occur if
the amount of net general revenue collected in the previous
fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net general
revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to
such fiscal year by at least one hundred seventy-five
million dollars.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
4. (1) In addition to the rate reductions under
subsections 2 and 3 of this section, beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which a reduction is made pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of this
section may be further reduced over a period of years. Each
reduction in the top rate of tax shall be by one-tenth of a
percent and no more than one reduction shall occur in a
calendar year. No more than three reductions shall be made
under this subsection. Reductions in the rate of tax shall
take effect on January first of a calendar year and such
reduced rates shall continue in effect until the next
reduction occurs.
(2) (a) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only
occur if:
a. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net
general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years

SB 950 4
prior to such fiscal year by at least two hundred million
dollars; and
b. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the amount of net general
revenue collected in the fiscal year five years prior,
adjusted annually by the percentage increase in inflation
over the preceding five fiscal years.
(b) The amount of net general revenue collected
required by subparagraph a. of paragraph (a) of this
subdivision in order to make a reduction pursuant to this
subsection shall be adjusted annually by the percent
increase in inflation beginning with January 2, 2023.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
The bracket for income subject to the top rate of tax shall
be eliminated once the top rate of tax has been reduced
below the rate applicable to such bracket, and the top
100 remaining rate of tax shall apply to all income in excess of
101 the income in the second highest remaining income bracket.
102 5. (1) In addition to the rate reductions pursuant to
103 subsections 2 to 4 of this section, beginning with the 2027
104 calendar year, the top rate of tax pursuant to subsection 1
105 of this section may be reduced by seventeen-hundredths of
106 one percent. Such reduction in the rate of tax shall take
107 effect on January first of a calendar year.
108 (2) A reduction in the rate of tax under this
109 subsection shall only occur if one or more institutions is

SB 950 5
110 subject to the tax imposed on the endowments of institutions
111 of higher education pursuant to section 146.200.
112 (3) The modification of tax rates under this
113 subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
114 after the date the modification takes effect.
115 (4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
116 by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
117 section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
118 6. Beginning with the 2017 calendar year, the brackets
119 of Missouri taxable income identified in subsection 1 of
120 this section shall be adjusted annually by the percent
121 increase in inflation. The director shall publish such
122 brackets annually beginning on or after October 1, 2016.
123 Modifications to the brackets shall take effect on January
124 first of each calendar year and shall apply to tax years
125 beginning on or after the effective date of the new brackets.
126 [6.] 7. As used in this section, the following terms
127 mean:
128 (1) "CPI", the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
129 Consumers for the United States as reported by the Bureau of
130 Labor Statistics, or its successor index;
131 (2) "CPI for the preceding calendar year", the average
132 of the CPI as of the close of the twelve-month period ending
133 on August thirty-first of such calendar year;
134 (3) "Net general revenue collected", all revenue
135 deposited into the general revenue fund, less refunds and
136 revenues originally deposited into the general revenue fund
137 but designated by law for a specific distribution or
138 transfer to another state fund;
139 (4) "Percent increase in inflation", the percentage,
140 if any, by which the CPI for the preceding calendar year

SB 950 6
141 exceeds the CPI for the year beginning September 1, 2014,
142 and ending August 31, 2015.
146.200. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Endowment", a permanent fund held by an
institution of higher education that:
(a) Consists of property, cash, cash equivalents,
stocks, bonds, or any other marketable security;
(b) Is used for purposes indicated by donors to such
fund or for other purposes related to the mission of the
institution of higher education; and
(c) Attempts to maintain and grow the principal of
such fund, while annually disbursing all or part of
investment earnings generated by the fund;
(2) "Qualifying institution of higher education", an
institution of higher education that:
(a) Is affiliated with, or provides medical faculty
to, any abortion facility, as such term is defined in
section 188.015;
(b) Offers specific medical residencies or fellowships
that offer training in performing or inducing abortions; or
(c) Supports in any manner any abortion facility where
abortions are performed or induced when not necessary to
save the life of the mother.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, a tax is hereby imposed for every tax year on the
endowment of a qualifying institution of higher education at
a rate of one and nine-tenths percent of the aggregate fair
market value of the assets of such endowment. Any
institution that becomes a qualifying institution of higher
education on or after January 1, 2027, shall remain subject
to the tax imposed under this section regardless of whether

SB 950 7
such institution no longer meets the definition of a
qualifying institution of higher education as defined under
this section.
3. Revenues generated by the tax imposed under this
section shall be deposited in the general revenue fund.
4. The department of revenue shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓